Tennessee, session 114, SB2588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-5-108(e)(3), is amended by
deleting "ten (10) days after" and substituting "within ten (10) business days after".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2588
010229
- 1 -